Maryland, session 2026, HB1555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–402.
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2020, and continuing until June 30, 2032, there is an
Accountability and Implementation Board.
(d) (1) (i) The Board is composed of seven members appointed by the
Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, chosen from a slate prepared by the
Nominating Committee established under § 5–403 of this subtitle.
(ii) When appointing members of the Board, the Governor shall
select from the slate of nominees nominated in accordance with § 5–403(c) of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1555 3
(iii) The Governor shall appoint members to the Board within 30 days
after the date on which the Governor receives the slate of nominees nominated in
accordance with § 5–403(c) of this subtitle.
(2) The Board shall consist of individuals who collectively:
(i) Reflect, to the extent practicable, the geographic, racial, ethnic,
cultural, and gender diversity of the State; and
(ii) Have a high level of knowledge and expertise in:
1. Early education through secondary education policy;
2. Postsecondary education policy;
3. Teaching in public schools;
4. Strategies used by top–performing state and national
education systems in the world;
5. Leading and implementing systemic change in complex
organizations; and
6. Financial auditing and accounting.
(3) The Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
House of Delegates jointly shall appoint a chair of the Board from among the Board’s
members.
(4) A member of the Board:
(i) May not receive compensation as a member of the Board; but
(ii) Is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard
State Travel Regulations for duties performed under this subtitle.
(5) (i) The term of a member is [6] 4 years.
(ii) The terms of the members are staggered as follows:
1. The terms of three initial members shall terminate on July
1, 2024;
2. The terms of two initial members shall terminate on July
1, 2025; and

HOUSE BILL 1555
3. The terms of two initial members shall terminate on July
1, 2026.
(iii) A member may be renominated by the Nominating Committee.
(6) A majority of Board members constitutes a quorum.
(7) Action by the Board requires the affirmative vote of a majority of the
appointed members.
5–405.
(a) Subject to the judgment of the Board and in accordance with this section, each
fiscal year a portion of the increase in the State share of major education aid, as defined in
§ 5–201 of this title, over the amount provided in the prior fiscal year shall be withheld
from public schools and local school systems.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, beginning in fiscal year 2023,
25% of the increase in the State share of major education aid over the amount provided in
the prior fiscal year shall be automatically withheld from a local school system for the next
fiscal year.
[(c) (1) For fiscal year 2023, the Board shall release funds withheld under this
section if the Board finds that a local school system has met the minimum guidelines for
the submission of the initial implementation plan under § 5–404 of this subtitle.
(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2024 and ending in fiscal year 2025, the Board
shall release funds withheld under this section each year if the Board finds that a local
school system or public school:
(i) Has developed an initial implementation plan under § 5–404 of
this subtitle; and
(ii) Has received approval for its initial implementation plan and for
any subsequent modifications.]
[(d)] (C) Beginning in fiscal year 2026, the Board shall consider releasing funds
withheld under this section to a public school or local school system if:
(1) The Board receives a recommendation to release funds from:
(i) The Department;
(ii) The Career and Technical Education Committee established
under § 21–209 of this article; or

HOUSE BILL 1555 5
(iii) An Expert Review Team established under § 5–411 of this
subtitle; or
(2) The Board determines that a public school or local school system has
made sufficient progress on an implementation plan or taken appropriate steps to improve
student performance.
[(e)] (D) The Board may withhold more than 25% of the increase in the State
share of major education aid over the amount provided in the current fiscal year from a
public school or local school system, if, in the judgment of the Board:
(1) A local school system has not made satisfactory efforts to develop or
revise the implementation plan required to be approved by the Board under § 5–404 of this
subtitle;
(2) A public school or local school system has not made sufficient progress
on its implementation plan; or
(3) A public school or local school system has not taken appropriate steps
to improve student performance.
[(f)] (E) In determining whether to release or withhold additional funds under
this section, the Board shall consider whether a public school or local school system has
been responsive to the recommendations of the Department, the Career and Technical
Education Committee, an Expert Review Team, and the Board’s staff.
[(g)] (F) The Board shall notify the Governor, the President of the Senate, and
the Speaker of the House of Delegates of a decision not to release funds or to withhold
additional funds.
[(h)] (G) (1) If the Board finds that funding should not be released under
subsection (c) [or subsection (d)] of this section, the Board shall, on or before December 1,
issue an initial warning to the public school principal or county superintendent that funds
may not be released in the next fiscal year.
(2) A warning issued under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall inform
the local principal or county superintendent of:
(i) The findings by the Board and the reasoning for the findings; and
(ii) Any steps that may be undertaken to remedy the finding.
(3) On or before February 1, the Board shall make a final determination on
whether to release funds under this section for the next fiscal year.

HOUSE BILL 1555
(4) If a public school or local school system makes progress in some areas
but not in others, the Board may determine that a portion of the funds may be released
while a portion may be withheld.
[(i)] (H) The Board shall notify the State Superintendent and the Comptroller
for purposes of § 5–205 of this title by June 1 of each year of the Board’s final decision to
release, not release, or withhold additional funds under this section in the next fiscal year.
[(j)] (I) (1) The Board may determine it is necessary to release or withhold
funds for the current fiscal year.
(2) The Board shall notify the State Superintendent and the Comptroller
as soon as practicable for purposes of § 5–205 of this title if it decides to release or withhold
additional funds during the current fiscal year.
[(k)] (J) The Board shall develop an appeals process through which a public
school or local school system may contest the withholding of funds under this section.
(K) (1) A PUBLIC SCHOOL OR LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY APPEAL TO
THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A
DECISION ISSUED BY THE BOARD TO WITHHOLD FUNDS UNDER THE APPEALS
PROCESS DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) AN APPEAL HEARING SHALL BE HELD IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE
PUBLIC SCHOOL OR LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IS LOCATED.
(3) IF, AFTER REVIEWING ALL OF THE EVIDENCE, THE
ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE FINDS THAT THE DECISION TO WITHHOLD FUNDS BY
THE BOARD WAS ARBITRARY, CAPRICIOUS, OR CONTRARY TO THE
RECOMMENDATIONS RECEIVED BY THE BOARD FROM AN ENTITY UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SHALL:
(I) ISSUE A DECISION AND ORDER STATING THE JUDGE’S
FINDINGS OF FACT AND CONCLUSIONS OF LAW; AND
(II) ISSUE AND CAUSE TO BE SERVED ON THE BOARD AN ORDER
REQUIRING THE BOARD TO:
1. CEASE AND DESIST FROM WITHHOLDING THE
FUNDING FROM THE PUBLIC SCHOOL OR LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM; AND
2. TAKE AFFIRMATIVE ACTION TO EFFECTUATE THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1555 7
(4) A DECISION OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IS FINAL.
5–415.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION
BOARD.
(3) “COUNCIL” MEANS THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE
STAKEHOLDER ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(B) (1) THERE IS A BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE
STAKEHOLDER ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE COUNCIL IS TO ADVISE THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON WHETHER POLICIES ADOPTED OR ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE BOARD
ARE FEASIBLE AND EFFECTIVE AT THE CLASSROOM LEVEL OF IMPLEMENTATION.
(C) THE COUNCIL SHALL CONSIST OF THE FOLLOWING NINE MEMBERS,
APPOINTED JOINTLY BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE:
(1) ONE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT FROM A RURAL LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM, NOMINATED BY THE PUBLIC SCHOOLS SUPERINTENDENTS’ ASSOCIATION
OF MARYLAND;
(2) ONE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT FROM A SUBURBAN OR URBAN
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM, NOMINATED BY THE PUBLIC SCHOOLS
SUPERINTENDENTS’ ASSOCIATION OF MARYLAND;
(3) ONE MEMBER OF A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION, NOMINATED
BY THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF BOARDS OF EDUCATION;
(4) ONE TEACHER ACTIVELY TEACHING IN AN ELEMENTARY SCHOOL,
NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND STATE EDUCATION ASSOCIATION;
(5) ONE TEACHER ACTIVELY TEACHING IN A MIDDLE OR HIGH
SCHOOL, NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND STATE EDUCATION ASSOCIATION;

HOUSE BILL 1555
(6) ONE SPECIAL EDUCATION TEACHER ACTIVELY TEACHING IN A
PUBLIC SCHOOL, NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND STATE EDUCATION ASSOCIATION;
(7) TWO PARENTS OF STUDENTS ENROLLED IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN
THE STATE, NOMINATED BY FREE STATE PTA; AND
(8) ONE STUDENT ENROLLED IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL, NOMINATED BY
THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF STUDENT COUNCILS.
(D) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS SHALL BE 4 YEARS.
(II) THE TERM OF THE MEMBER WHO IS A STUDENT SHALL BE 1
YEAR.
(2) ANY VACANCY ON THE COUNCIL SHALL BE FILLED IN THE SAME
MANNER AS THE ORIGINAL APPOINTMENT.
(E) (1) THE COUNCIL SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE EACH QUARTER TO
REVIEW WHETHER THE POLICIES ADOPTED AND ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE BOARD ARE
FEASIBLE AND EFFECTIVE AT THE CLASSROOM LEVEL OF IMPLEMENTATION.
(2) IF AFTER A REVIEW UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
THE COUNCIL FINDS THAT ANY POLICY ADOPTED OR ACTION TAKEN BY THE BOARD
IS INFEASIBLE OR INEFFECTIVE AT THE CLASSROOM LEVEL OF IMPLEMENTATION,
THE COUNCIL SHALL SEND A WRITTEN NOTICE OF CONCERN TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY THAT STATES:
(I) THE POLICY OR ACTION OF THE BOARD;
(II) THE ENTITY AFFECTED; AND
(III) DETAILED REASONS FOR THE DETERMINATION OF
INFEASIBILITY OR INEFFECTIVENESS.
(F) THE COUNCIL IS SUBJECT TO THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT.
9.10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Inspector General” means the Inspector General in the Maryland Office of
the Inspector General for Education.

HOUSE BILL 1555 9
9.10–104.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Inspector
General shall be responsible for examining and investigating the matters listed in
subsection (b) of this section with respect to the management and affairs of the following
entities:
(i) County boards, local school systems, and public schools;
(ii) Nonpublic schools that receive State funds;
(iii) The Department; [and]
(IV) THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD;
AND
[(iv)] (V) The Interagency Commission on School Construction.
(2) The Inspector General may not examine or investigate a nonpublic
school that does not receive State funds.
(b) The Inspector General may receive and investigate complaints or information
concerning:
(1) Instances of fraud, waste, or abuse involving the use of public funds and
property;
(2) Violations of civil rights, as defined in federal or State laws, of students
or employees of the entities listed in subsection (a) of this section;
(3) Whether policies and procedures governing the prevention and
reporting of child abuse and neglect comply with applicable federal and State laws on child
abuse and neglect; and
(4) Compliance with other applicable federal and State laws.
Article – State Government
2–10A–16.
(A) THERE IS A JOINT OVERSIGHT COMMITTEE ON THE BLUEPRINT FOR
MARYLAND’S FUTURE.
(B) (1) THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF 10 MEMBERS.
(2) OF THE 10 MEMBERS:

HOUSE BILL 1555
(I) 5 SHALL BE MEMBERS OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND,
APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE; AND
(II) 5 SHALL BE MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES,
APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE.
(C) (1) THE MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF
THE PRESIDING OFFICER WHO APPOINTED THEM.
(2) (I) IF A VACANCY OCCURS AMONG THE SENATORS ON THE
COMMITTEE, A SUCCESSOR PROMPTLY SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT
OF THE SENATE.
(II) IF A VACANCY OCCURS AMONG THE DELEGATES ON THE
COMMITTEE, A SUCCESSOR PROMPTLY SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF
THE HOUSE.
(D) FROM AMONG THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMITTEE, THE PRESIDENT
OF THE SENATE SHALL APPOINT A SENATOR TO SERVE AS THE SENATE CHAIR OF
THE COMMITTEE, AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE SHALL APPOINT A DELEGATE
TO SERVE AS THE HOUSE CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE.
(E) A MAJORITY OF THE FULL AUTHORIZED MEMBERSHIP OF THE
COMMITTEE IS A QUORUM.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES SHALL PROVIDE STAFF
ASSISTANCE TO THE COMMITTEE.
(G) THE COMMITTEE SHALL:
(1) HOLD AN ORGANIZATIONAL MEETING PROMPTLY AFTER THE
APPOINTMENT OF ITS MEMBERS; AND
(2) HOLD ANY OTHER MEETINGS THAT THE COMMITTEE CONSIDERS
NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT ITS DUTIES EFFICIENTLY.
(H) THE COMMITTEE MAY:
(1) HOLD A HEARING ON ANY MATTER RELATING TO THE FUNCTIONS
OF THE COMMITTEE; AND
(2) CONSIDER A VOTE ON A BILL OR RESOLUTION REFERRED TO THE
COMMITTEE BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE OR THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE.

HOUSE BILL 1555 11
(I) THE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE OVERSIGHT OVER THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE AS OVERSEEN BY
THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND
IMPLEMENTATION BOARD.
(J) THE COMMITTEE MAY:
(1) REVIEW THE OUTPUT MEASURES AND OUTCOME MEASURES OF
THE COMPREHENSIVE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN FOR THE BLUEPRINT FOR
MARYLAND’S FUTURE FOR ALIGNMENT WITH THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY FOR THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE;
(2) REVIEW ENFORCEMENT DECISIONS OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT
OF EDUCATION AND THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD FOR
CONSISTENCY AND FAIRNESS ACROSS LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS IN THE STATE;
(3) REVIEW ALL DECISIONS OF THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND
IMPLEMENTATION BOARD TO WITHHOLD FUNDS FROM A PUBLIC SCHOOL OR LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM EXCEEDING $1,000,000 IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–405 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE, BEFORE ANY FUNDS ARE WITHHELD; AND
(4) REQUIRE THE CHAIR OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD TO SUBMIT ORAL TESTIMONY AT
LEAST ONE TIME EACH QUARTER OF THE YEAR.
(K) THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND THE ACCOUNTABILITY
AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD SHALL COOPERATE FULLY WITH THE COMMITTEE.
(L) (1) IN CARRYING OUT ANY OF ITS FUNCTIONS OR POWERS, THE
COMMITTEE MAY:
(I) ISSUE SUBPOENAS;
(II) COMPEL THE ATTENDANCE OF WITNESSES;
(III) COMPEL THE PRODUCTION OF ANY PAPERS, BOOKS,
ACCOUNTS, DOCUMENTS, AND TESTIMONY;
(IV) ADMINISTER OATHS; AND
(V) CAUSE THE DEPOSITIONS OF WITNESSES WHO RESIDE IN OR
OUTSIDE THE STATE TO BE TAKEN IN THE MANNER PROVIDED BY LAW FOR TAKING
DEPOSITIONS IN A CIVIL CASE.

HOUSE BILL 1555
(2) IF A PERSON FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A SUBPOENA ISSUED UNDER
THIS SECTION OR FAILS TO TESTIFY ON ANY MATTER ON WHICH THE PERSON
LAWFULLY MAY BE INTERROGATED, ON PETITION OF A MEMBER OF THE
COMMITTEE, A CIRCUIT COURT MAY PASS AN ORDER DIRECTING COMPLIANCE WITH
THE SUBPOENA OR COMPELLING TESTIMONY AND MAY ENFORCE THE ORDER BY
PROCEEDINGS FOR CONTEMPT.
(3) VENUE AND PROCEDURES FOR A PROCEEDING UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO DIRECT COMPLIANCE WITH A SUBPOENA
OR COMPEL TESTIMONY ARE AS PROVIDED IN § 2–1803 OF THIS TITLE.
(M) (1) SUBJECT TO § 2–1257 OF THIS TITLE, THE COMMITTEE SHALL
SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH
YEAR.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE WORK OF THE COMMITTEE; AND
(II) ANY RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE COMMITTEE.
2–1220.
(a) (1) In this subsection, “unit” includes each State department, agency, unit,
and program, including each clerk of court and each register of wills.
(2) (i) The Office of Legislative Audits shall conduct a fiscal/compliance
audit of each unit of the State government, except for units in the Legislative Branch.
(ii) The audit of each unit shall be conducted at an interval ranging
from 3 to 4 years unless the Legislative Auditor determines, on a case–by–case basis, that
more frequent audits are required.
(iii) In determining the audit interval for a unit, the Office of
Legislative Audits shall take into consideration:
1. the materiality and risk of the unit’s fiscal activities with
respect to the State’s fiscal activities;
2. the complexity of the unit’s fiscal structure; and
3. the nature and extent of audit findings in the unit’s prior
audit reports.

HOUSE BILL 1555 13
(iv) Each agency or program may be audited separately or as part of
a larger organizational unit of State government.
(3) Performance audits or financial statement audits shall be conducted
when authorized by the Legislative Auditor, when directed by the Joint Audit and
Evaluation Committee or the Executive Director, or when otherwise required by law.
(4) (i) In addition to the audits required under paragraph (2) of this
subsection, the Office of Legislative Audits may conduct a review when the objectives of the
work to be performed can be satisfactorily fulfilled without conducting an audit as
prescribed in § 2–1221 of this subtitle.
(ii) 1. The Office of Legislative Audits has the authority to
conduct a separate investigation of an act or allegation of fraud, waste, or abuse in the
obligation, expenditure, receipt, or use of State resources.
2. The Legislative Auditor shall determine whether an
investigation shall be conducted in conjunction with an audit undertaken in accordance
with this subsection or separately.
(5) If, on request of the Comptroller, the Joint Audit and Evaluation
Committee so directs, the Office of Legislative Audits shall audit or review a claim that has
been presented to the Comptroller for payment of an expenditure or disbursement and that
is alleged to have been made by or for an officer or unit of the State government.
(6) The Office of Legislative Audits shall conduct an audit or review to
determine the accuracy of information about or procedures of a unit of the State
government, as directed by the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee or the Executive
Director.
(b) If the General Assembly, by resolution, or the Joint Audit and Evaluation
Committee so directs, the Office of Legislative Audits shall conduct an audit or review of a
corporation or association to which the General Assembly has appropriated money or that
has received funds from an appropriation from the State Treasury.
(I) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, AND AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 3 YEARS,
THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE AUDITS SHALL CONDUCT A PERFORMANCE AUDIT OF
THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD TO EVALUATE THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE BOARD IN MEETING THE OUTPUT MEASURES AND
OUTCOME MEASURES OF THE COMPREHENSIVE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN OF THE
BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE ADOPTED BY THE BOARD AND THE
CONSISTENCY OF THE BOARD’S ENFORCEMENT ACROSS ALL THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEMS IN THE STATE.
(2) THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD SHALL
MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE AUDITS ALL BOARD

HOUSE BILL 1555
EMPLOYEES, RECORDS, AND INFORMATION SYSTEMS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE
LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR TO CONDUCT THE AUDIT OR AUDITS REQUIRED BY THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the members of
the Accountability and Implementation Board who are in office on the effective date of this
Act, shall expire as follows:
(1) the two members whose terms are scheduled to expire on June 30, 2026,
shall expire on that date, and the two members appointed by the Governor shall serve for
a term of 4 years beginning July 1, 2026, until a successor is appointed and qualifies;
(2) the three members whose terms are scheduled to expire on June 30,
2030, shall terminate on June 30, 2029, and the three members appointed by the Governor
shall serve for a term of 4 years beginning July 1, 2029, until a successor is appointed and
qualifies; and
(3) the two members whose terms are scheduled to expire on June 30, 2031,
shall terminate on June 30, 2030, and the two members appointed by the Governor shall
serve for a term of 4 years beginning July 1, 2030, until a successor is appointed and
qualifies.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.